New Mexico, session 2026, SB204.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--One hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the higher education department for expenditure in fiscal years 2027 and 2028 to supplement reduced or terminated federal funding for existing research projects at the university of New Mexico, New Mexico state university and the New Mexico institute of mining and technology that are feasibly able to be completed but for the reduction or termination in such funding. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2028 shall revert to the general fund. - 2 -